Louisiana, session 2026, HB352.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:173(A)(2)(introductory paragraph), (c), (e), and (h) and (D) are
hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 17:173(A)(2)(l) and (B)(9) are hereby enacted to
read as follows:
§173. Behavioral health services for students
A.
* * *
(2) Each public school governing authority shall adopt and make available
to the public a policy to implement the provisions of this Section. The authority
shall make such policy available to the public by, at a minimum, posting it on its
website and shall include it in its student handbook. The policy shall not create
onerous requirements for behavioral health providers resulting in a delay or barrier
to the provision of medically necessary services. The policy, at a minimum, shall
provide that:
* * *
(c) Behavioral health services shall be permitted during school hours if the
student's parent or legal guardian presents a behavioral health evaluation performed
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 352 ENROLLED
by an evaluator as well as an assessment and authorized treatment plan performed
by a behavioral health provider chosen by the parent or legal guardian and the
evaluation indicates that the services are necessary during school hours to assist the
student with behavioral health impairments associated with a medical diagnosis that
the evaluator determines are interfering with the student's ability to thrive in the
educational setting. If supervision of the behavioral health provider is conducted
virtually, no other student except the student receiving behavioral health services
shall be recorded.
* * *
(e) A public school governing authority shall not prohibit a behavioral health
evaluation, assessment, or authorized treatment plan from being performed on school
property in order to establish medical necessity or deliver medically necessary
services. Behavioral health services may shall be provided in a physical classroom,
to the extent that it is medically necessary, during any part of the school day,
including any and all instructional time in courses including but not limited to
English, reading, mathematics, and science. However, behavioral health services
shall also be provided outside of the physical classroom to the extent that it is
medically necessary. The school administrator and service provider shall work
collaboratively to create a consistent schedule that meets the medical needs of the
student and complies with the provider's ethical code of conduct. In developing the
student's plan, consideration shall include impacts on a school's operations and a
student's testing schedule. If the parties cannot agree, then the parties shall engage
in a dispute resolution process set forth by the state Department of Education in
accordance with Subsection D of this Section.
* * *
(h) While on a school campus, a behavioral service health provider shall
comply with, and abide by, the terms of any Individualized Education Plan,
Individualized Accommodation Plan, Section 504 Plan, Behavior Management Plan,
or Individualized Health Plan applicable to a student who is a patient of the provider.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 352 ENROLLED
The services furnished by a provider shall be incorporated into a written treatment
plan applicable to a student.
* * *
(l)(i) The contract or agreement between a public school governing authority
and a behavioral health provider may specify whether a school principal may dismiss
a behavioral health provider staff member from the campus and the terms under
which such a dismissal is permissible.
(ii) Within twenty-one days after a parent or guardian submits a behavioral
health treatment plan to a school administrator and no later than fourteen school days
after behavioral health services begin, the school administrator or his designee shall
ensure that a school-based service delivery review meeting is held in person or
virtually. At a minimum, the meeting shall include the school administrator or his
designee, the student's classroom teacher or teachers, and the behavioral health
provider. The meeting may also include the student's special education teacher, case
manager, or other school employee responsible for implementation of the student's
Individualized Education Plan, Individualized Accommodation Plan, Section 504
Plan, Behavior Intervention Plan, or Individualized Health Plan.
(iii) Behavioral health services may begin prior to the school-based service
delivery review meeting, if reasonable efforts are made to coordinate with school
personnel. A behavioral health provider may initiate and continue medically
necessary services, and the school shall provide reasonable access to the student,
pending completion of the meeting. Reasonable access shall include the ability to
enter the school, observe the student, and deliver authorized services during the
school day in coordination with instructional activities.
(iv) The school-based service delivery review meeting shall address, at a
minimum, the following:
(aa) Review of the provider's written treatment plan and any applicable
Individualized Education Plan, Individualized Accommodation Plan, Section 504
Plan, Behavior Intervention Plan, or Individualized Health Plan.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 352 ENROLLED
(bb) The role and responsibilities of the behavioral health provider while on
the school campus, including activities to be conducted in the classroom during
instructional time.
(cc) The classroom routines, school policies, and behavioral expectations
applicable to the student.
(dd) The method and frequency of ongoing communication between the
behavioral health provider and school personnel and the chain of communication for
questions or concerns.
(ee) The schedule for behavioral health services during the school day,
including how services will be coordinated with instructional activities, assessments,
and school-wide events.
(ff) Procedures for requesting a follow-up school-based service delivery
review meeting when the behavioral health provider changes or there is a material
change in the student's classroom or educational placement or in the behavioral
health provider's written treatment plan. The school-based service delivery meeting
shall not take the place of any meetings required by a student's Individualized
Education Plan.
(v) A behavioral health provider delivering services pursuant to this Section
shall use reasonable efforts to minimize disruption to instruction and classroom
management.
(vi) Recommendations, concerns, or requested changes regarding classroom
strategies, interventions, accommodations, modifications, supports, or safety
procedures shall be communicated to the teacher and the school administrator or his
designee outside the presence of other students, except when immediate action is
necessary to prevent imminent risk of harm to the student or another person.
(vii) A behavioral health provider shall not direct, supervise, or evaluate the
job performance of a teacher or other school employee.
(viii) A behavioral health provider's role in the classroom shall be limited to
delivery of services to the designated student, which may include collaboration with
school personnel to support implementation of the student's treatment plan.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 352 ENROLLED
(ix) A behavioral health provider shall not implement or direct the
implementation of medically necessary services that knowingly interfere, impede,
or conflict with services the school is legally required to provide under a student's
Individualized Education Plan, Individualized Accommodation Plan, Section 504
Plan, Behavior Intervention Plan, or Individualized Health Plan, without
collaboration and agreement between service providers.
* * *
B. For purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
* * *
(9) "School-based service delivery review meeting" means a meeting held,
either in person or virtually, for the purpose of reviewing the delivery of behavioral
health services in the school setting, including the behavioral health provider's role,
applicable student plans, classroom expectations, communication, scheduling, and
other procedures necessary to support uninterrupted instruction and appropriate
coordination with school personnel and the behavioral health provider.
* * *
D. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall adopt rules
for the implementation of this Section and provide for a dispute resolution process
relative to the services provided pursuant to this Section according to guidelines
established by the state Department of Education. A parent or legal guardian shall
be the sole person permitted to file a dispute resolution claim in relation to a student,
which shall be filed only after an alleged incident has occurred. In the event of a
conflict between a student's Individualized Education Plan, Individualized
Accommodation Plan, Section 504 Plan, Behavior Intervention Plan, or
Individualized Health Plan and a behavioral health provider's written treatment plan,
the applicable student plan shall control with respect to the educational services and
supports addressed by that plan. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require
medically necessary behavioral health services authorized under this Section be
included in any such student plan as a condition of being delivered on school
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 352 ENROLLED
property, nor shall the absence of such services from any such student plan constitute
a basis to deny those services.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.